Hawaii statutes.
[§634J-6] Motion as stay of proceedings.
When a motion pursuant to section 634J-2 is filed prior to trial, the
litigation is stayed, and the moving defendant need not plead until ten days
after the motion shall have been denied, or if granted, until ten days after
the required security has been furnished and the moving defendant has been
given written notice. When a motion pursuant to section 634J-2 is made at any
time thereafter, the litigation shall be stayed for such period after the
denial of the motion or the furnishing of the required security as the court
shall determine. [L 1993, c 124, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next